Vermont statutes. Title 22 Libraries, History, and Information Technology
Chapter 15. Department of Information and Innovation

§§ 901-902a.
Repealed. 2019, No. 49, § 7 eff. June 10, 2019.

§ 902.
Appointment of Commissioner; powers and duties.

The Governor, with the advice and consent of the Senate, shall appoint the Commissioner of Information and Innovation who shall be the Chief Information Officer of the State. The Commissioner shall appoint a deputy commissioner who shall serve at the pleasure of the Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall serve as the administrative head of the Department of Information and Innovation.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 31

, § 6.

§ 902a.
Information Technology Internal Service Fund.

An Information Technology Internal Service Fund is created to support activities of the Department of Information and Innovation.

An agency, department, or division or other State or nonstate entity which receives services of the Department of Information and Innovation shall be charged for those services on a basis established by the Commissioner of Information and Innovation with the approval of the Secretary of Administration.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 65

, § 283.

§ 903.
Repealed. 2009, No. 61, § 7.